Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 410.2 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For noncompliance with the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities
Licensing Act or the rules of the Department of Human Services to
receive a serious designation, a determination shall be made that
there was imminent risk of harm to the child involved.
Req. No. 12668 Page 1

B. The Department shall document:
1. The age of the child involved;
2. The facility's efforts to mitigate the risk before, during,
and after the noncompliance;
3. The length of time the facility was out of compliance; and
4. The facility's record of compliance during the previous
twelve-month period.
C. If Child Welfare Services conducts an investigation and
finds that the complaint was unsubstantiated, Child Care Services
shall not investigate further.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12668 CMA 02/13/25











Req. No. 12668 Page 2